Maryland, session 2026, HB0536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
20–609.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0536*

HOUSE BILL 536
(a) (1) In this section[, “reasonable] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “REASONABLE accommodation” means an accommodation:
[(1)] (I) for an employee’s disability caused or contributed to by
pregnancy, CHILDBIRTH, MENOPAUSE, OR A RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION; and
[(2)] (II) that does not impose an undue hardship on the employee’s
employer.
(3) “RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION” INCLUDES:
(I) LACTATION OR THE NEED TO EXPRESS BREAST MILK FOR A
NURSING CHILD; AND
(II) THE NEED TO MANAGE THE EFFECTS OF VASOMOTOR
SYMPTOMS RELATED TO MENOPAUSE.
(b) Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy [or], childbirth,
MENOPAUSE, OR A RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION:
(1) are temporary disabilities for all job–related purposes; and
(2) shall be treated as temporary disabilities under any health or
temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment.
(c) Written and unwritten employment policies and practices involving matters
such as the commencement and duration of leave, the availability of extensions of leave,
the accrual of seniority and other benefits and privileges, reinstatement, and payment
under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan, formal or informal,
shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy [or], childbirth, MENOPAUSE, OR A
RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION on the same terms and conditions as they are applied to
other temporary disabilities.
(d) If an employee requests a reasonable accommodation, the employer shall
explore with the employee all possible means of providing the reasonable accommodation,
including:
(1) changing the employee’s job duties;
(2) changing the employee’s work hours;
(3) relocating the employee’s work area;

HOUSE BILL 536 3
(4) providing mechanical or electrical aids;
(5) transferring the employee to a less strenuous or less hazardous
position; or
(6) providing leave.
(e) (1) If an employee requests a transfer to a less strenuous or less hazardous
position as a reasonable accommodation, the employer shall transfer the employee for a
period of time up to the duration of the employee’s pregnancy OR A RELATED MEDICAL
CONDITION UNDER THIS SECTION if:
(1) (I) the employer has a policy, practice, or collective bargaining
agreement requiring or authorizing the transfer of a temporarily disabled employee to a
less strenuous or less hazardous position for the duration of the disability; or
(2) (II) the employee’s health care provider advises the transfer and the
employer can provide the reasonable accommodation by transferring the employee without:
(i) 1. creating additional employment that the employer would
not otherwise have created;
(ii) 2. discharging any employee;
(iii) 3. transferring any employee with more seniority than the
employee requesting the reasonable accommodation; or
(iv) 4. promoting any employee who is not qualified to perform
the job.
(2) TO DETERMINE WHETHER AN UNDUE BURDEN IS IMPOSED BY A
TRANSFER REQUEST BY AN EMPLOYEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYER MAY CONSIDER THE OPERATIONAL IMPACT OF ANY
STAFFING GAP CREATED BY THE TRANSFER, INCLUDING:
(I) THE AVAILABILITY OF OTHER PERSONNEL TO PERFORM
THE DUTIES OF THE TRANSFERRED EMPLOYEE; AND
(II) THE COST AND FEASIBILITY OF TEMPORARY COVERAGE.
(f) (1) An employer may require an employee to provide a certification from
the employee’s health care provider concerning the medical advisability of a reasonable
accommodation to the same extent a certification is required for other temporary
disabilities.

HOUSE BILL 536
(2) A certification under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include:
(i) the date the reasonable accommodation became medically
advisable;
(ii) the probable duration of the reasonable accommodation; and
(iii) an explanatory statement as to the medical advisability of the
reasonable accommodation.
(g) An employer shall post in a conspicuous location, and include in any employee
handbook, information concerning an employee’s rights to reasonable accommodations and
leave for a disability caused or contributed to by pregnancy, CHILDBIRTH, MENOPAUSE,
OR A RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION.
(h) An employer may not interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the
attempt to exercise, any right provided under this section.
(i) This section may not be construed to:
(1) affect any other provision of law relating to discrimination on the basis
of sex or pregnancy; or
(2) diminish in any way the coverage of pregnancy, childbirth,
MENOPAUSE, or a RELATED medical condition [related to pregnancy or childbirth] under
this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.